el: Τύπος ανταλλακτικού για πνευστά ορειχάλκινα όργανα: Προστατευτικό χείλους καμπάνας; Κουμπί βαλβίδας; Βάση/βίδα λύρας; Υποδοχή επιστομίου; Κιτ επισκευής; Ανταλλακτική βίδα/σύνδεσμος; Ολκός (εσωτερικός); Ολκός (εξωτερικός); Φελλός ολκού; Βίδα αναστολέα ολκού; Καπάκι βαλβίδας (κάτω); Καπάκι βαλβίδας (πάνω); Φελλός βαλβίδας; Τσόχα/μαξιλαράκι βαλβίδας; Οδηγός βαλβίδας; Προστατευτικό/αναστολέας λαδιού βαλβίδας; Έμβολο βαλβίδας; Ελατήριο βαλβίδας; Στέλεχος βαλβίδας; Σύστημα κλειδιού νερού (βαλβίδα σιέλου); Φελλός κλειδιού νερού; Άλλο
de: Art der Ersatzteile für Blechblasinstrumente: Schallbecherschutz; Ventilknopf; Marschgabelhalterung/-schraube; Mundstückaufnahme; Reparaturset; Ersatzschraube/-befestigung; Zug (innen); Zug (außen); Zugkork; Zuganschlagschraube; Ventildeckel (unten); Ventildeckel (oben); Ventilkork; Ventilfilz/-polster; Ventilführung; Ventilölschutz/Puffer; Ventilkolben; Ventilfeder; Ventilschaft; Wasserklappen-Baugruppe; Wasserklappenkork; Sonstiges
fr: Type de pièce de rechange pour instrument à vent en cuivre: Protège-pavillon; Bouton de piston; Support/vis de lyre; Récepteur d’embouchure; Kit de réparation; Vis/fixation de rechange; Coulisse (intérieure); Coulisse (extérieure); Liège de coulisse; Vis d’arrêt de coulisse; Chapeau de piston (inférieur); Chapeau de piston (supérieur); Liège de piston; Feutre/coussinet de piston; Guide de piston; Protection/butoir d’huile de piston; Piston; Ressort de piston; Tige de piston; Clé d’eau complète; Liège de clé d’eau; Autre
lt-LT: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų atsarginių dalių tipas: Žiočių krašto apsauga; Vožtuvo mygtukas; Lyros laikiklis / varžtas; Pūstuko lizdas; Taisymo rinkinys; Pakaitinis varžtas / tvirtinimo detalė; Slankiklis (vidinis); Slankiklis (išorinis); Slankiklio kamštelis; Slankiklio stabdiklio varžtas; Vožtuvo dangtelis (apatinis); Vožtuvo dangtelis (viršutinis); Vožtuvo kamštelis; Vožtuvo veltinis / pagalvėlė; Vožtuvo kreiptuvas; Vožtuvo alyvos apsauga / buferis; Vožtuvo stūmoklis; Vožtuvo spyruoklė; Vožtuvo kotas; Vandens vožtuvo (kondensato) blokas; Vandens vožtuvo kamštelis; Kita
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer pótalkatrész típusa: Tölcsérperem-védő; Billentyűgomb; Kottatartó-rögzítő/csavar; Fúvókabefogó; Javítókészlet; Pótcsavar/kötőelem; Tolócső (belső); Tolócső (külső); Tolócsőparafa; Tolócső-ütköző csavar; Szelepfedél (alsó); Szelepfedél (felső); Szelep-parafa; Szelepfilc/párna; Szelepvezető; Szelepolaj-védő/ütköző; Szelepdugattyú; Szeleprugó; Szelepszár; Vízleeresztő szelep (nyálszelep) egység; Vízleeresztő-parafa; Egyéb
cs: Typ náhradního dílu pro žesťové nástroje: Ochrana okraje ozvučníku; Tlačítko ventilu; Držák/šroub lyry; Trubička pro nátrubek; Sada na opravu; Náhradní šroub / spojovací prvek; Tah (vnitřní); Tah (vnější); Korek tahu; Zajišťovací šroub tahu; Kryt ventilu (spodní); Kryt ventilu (horní); Korek ventilu; Plsť/podložka ventilu; Vodítko ventilu; Kryt proti oleji / doraz; Píst ventilu; Pružina ventilu; Dřík ventilu; Sestava vodní klapky; Korek vodní klapky; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta nadomestnega dela za trobila: Zaščita oboda odmevnika; Gumb za prst; Nosilec/vijak za liro; Vrat za ustnik; Komplet za popravilo; Nadomestni vijak / pritrdilni element; Poteg (notranji); Poteg (zunanji); Pluta za poteg; Vijak za zaustavitev potega; Pokrovček ventila (spodnji); Pokrovček ventila (zgornji); Pluta za ventil; Polst / blazinica za ventil; Vodilo ventila; Zaščita / odbojnik za olje ventila; Bat ventila; Vzmet ventila; Steblo ventila; Sklop vodnega ključa (ventila za slino); Pluta za vodni ključ; Drugo
th: ประเภทอะไหล่สำหรับเครื่องดนตรีทองเหลือง: ยางหุ้มขอบลำโพง; ปุ่มกด; จุดยึด/สกรูยึดที่หนีบโน้ต; ส่วนรับปากเป่า; ชุดซ่อม; สกรู/ตัวยึดสำรอง; สไลด์ (ด้านใน); สไลด์ (ด้านนอก); ไม้ก๊อกสไลด์; สกรูหยุดสไลด์; ฝาครอบวาล์ว (ด้านล่าง); ฝาครอบวาล์ว (ด้านบน); ไม้ก๊อกวาล์ว; สักหลาด/เบาะรองวาล์ว; ตัวนำวาล์ว; การ์ดกันน้ำมันวาล์ว/กันกระแทก; ลูกสูบวาล์ว; สปริงวาล์ว; ก้านวาล์ว; ชุดวาล์วระบายน้ำ (Spit valve); ไม้ก๊อกระบายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
sv: Ersättningsdelar till bleckblåsinstrument: Kantskydd för klockstycke; Fingerknapp; Lyrfäste/skruv; Munstyckesfäste; Reparationskit; Ersättningsskruv/fästelement; Bygel (inre); Bygel (yttre); Bygelkork; Stoppskruv för bygel; Ventillock (botten); Ventillock (topp); Ventilkork; Ventilfilt/dämpare; Ventilstyrning; Ventiloljeskydd/stötdämpare; Ventilkolv; Ventilfjäder; Ventilskaft; Vattenklaffsenhet (spottventil); Vattenklaffskork; Övrigt
tr: Bakır nefesli çalgı yedek parça tipi: Kalak kenarı koruyucusu; Parmak düğmesi; Lir montajı/vidası; Ağızlık yuvası; Onarım kiti; Yedek vida/bağlantı elemanı; Sürgü (iç); Sürgü (dış); Sürgü mantarı; Sürgü durdurucu vidası; Piston kapağı (alt); Piston kapağı (üst); Piston mantarı; Piston keçesi/yastığı; Piston kılavuzu; Piston yağ koruyucusu/tamponu; Piston; Piston yayı; Piston sapı; Su anahtarı (tükürük valfi) tertibatı; Su anahtarı mantarı; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ náhradného dielu pre plechové dychové nástroje: Ochrana okraja ozvučníka; Tlačidlo klapky; Držiak/skrutka lýry; Puzdro nátrubku; Súprava na opravu; Náhradná skrutka/spojovací materiál; Znižec (vnútorný); Znižec (vonkajší); Korok znižca; Skrutka zarážky znižca; Klobúčik ventilu (spodný); Klobúčik ventilu (vrchný); Korok ventilu; Plsť/podložka ventilu; Vedenie ventilu; Ochranný kryt/doraz ventilu; Piest ventilu; Pružina ventilu; Driek ventilu; Zostava vodnej klapky; Korok vodnej klapky; Iné
zh-TW: 銅管樂器替換零件類型: 喇叭口邊緣保護套; 活塞按扣; 譜夾座/螺絲; 吹嘴接收管; 維修工具包; 替換螺絲/緊固件; 伸縮管 (內管); 伸縮管 (外管); 伸縮管軟木塞; 伸縮管止動螺絲; 活塞蓋 (底部); 活塞蓋 (頂部); 活塞軟木塞; 活塞毛氈/緩衝墊; 活塞導引器; 活塞油擋/緩衝器; 活塞; 活塞彈簧; 活塞連桿; 排水鍵 (口水閥) 組件; 排水鍵軟木塞; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul piesei de schimb pentru instrumente de suflat din alamă: Protecție margine pavilion; Buton pentru deget; Suport/șurub pentru liră; Receptor muștiuc; Kit de reparații; Șurub/element de fixare de schimb; Culisă (interioară); Culisă (exterioară); Plută pentru culisă; Șurub opritor culisă; Capac supapă (inferior); Capac supapă (superior); Plută pentru supapă; Pâslă/pernuță pentru supapă; Ghidaj supapă; Protecție/amortizor ulei supapă; Piston supapă; Arc supapă; Tijă supapă; Ansamblu clapă de apă (supapă de salivă); Plută pentru clapa de apă; Altele
vi: Loại linh kiện thay thế cho nhạc cụ bộ đồng: Miếng bảo vệ vành loa; Nút bấm; Khung gắn/ốc vít giữ giá nhạc; Ống nhận búp kèn; Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa; Ốc vít/chốt giữ thay thế; Ống trượt (trong); Ống trượt (ngoài); Bấc ống trượt; Ốc vít chặn ống trượt; Nắp van (dưới); Nắp van (trên); Bấc van; Nỉ/đệm van; Thanh dẫn hướng van; Tấm chắn dầu/đệm van; Pít-tông van; Lò xo van; Trục van; Cụm van thoát nước; Bấc khóa nước; Khác
it: Tipo di parte di ricambio per strumenti a ottone: Protezione per il bordo della campana; Tasto; Supporto/vite per leggio; Ricevitore del bocchino; Kit di riparazione; Vite/fissaggio di ricambio; Pompa (interna); Pompa (esterna); Sughero della pompa; Vite di arresto della pompa; Tappo della valvola (inferiore); Tappo della valvola (superiore); Sughero della valvola; Feltro/cuscinetto della valvola; Guida della valvola; Paracolpi/protezione per l'olio della valvola; Pistone della valvola; Molla della valvola; Stelo della valvola; Gruppo chiave dell'acqua (valvola di scarico); Sughero della chiave dell'acqua; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de peça de reposição para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Protetor de borda da campana; Botão do pisto; Suporte/parafuso para lira; Receptor do bocal; Kit de reparo; Parafuso/fixador de reposição; Pompa (interna); Pompa (externa); Cortiça da pompa; Parafuso limitador da pompa; Tampa do pisto (inferior); Tampa do pisto (superior); Cortiça da válvula; Feltro/almofada da válvula; Guia da válvula; Protetor de óleo/amortecedor da válvula; Pisto da válvula; Mola da válvula; Haste da válvula; Conjunto da chave de água (válvula de saliva); Cortiça da chave de água; Outros
ja: 金管楽器交換ピースタイプ: ベルリムガード; フィンガーボタン; 譜ばさみ (ライヤー) マウント/ネジ; マウスピースレシーバー; 修理キット; 交換用ネジ/留め具; スライド (内管); スライド (外管); スライドコルク; スライドストッパーネジ; バルブキャップ (下); バルブキャップ (上); バルブコルク; バルブフェルト/クッション; バルブガイド; バルブオイルガード/バンパー; ピストンバルブ; バルブスプリング; バルブステム; ウォーターキー (スピットバルブ) アセンブリ; ウォーターキーコルク; その他
en: Brass instrument replacement part type: Bell rim guard; Finger button; Lyre mount/screw; Mouthpiece receiver; Repair kit; Replacement screw/fastener; Slide (inner); Slide (outer); Slide cork; Slide stopper screw; Valve cap (bottom); Valve cap (top); Valve cork; Valve felt/cushion; Valve guide; Valve oil guard/bumper; Valve piston; Valve spring; Valve stem; Water key (spit valve) assembly; Water key cork; Other
nl: Type reserveonderdeel voor koperblaasinstrumenten: Beker-randbeschermer; Vingerknop; Lierbevestiging/schroef; Mondstukhouder; Reparatieset; Vervangende schroef/bevestiging; Schuif (binnen); Schuif (buiten); Schuifkurk; Schuifstopperschroef; Ventieldop (onder); Ventieldop (boven); Ventielkurk; Ventielvilt/kussen; Ventielgeleider; Ventielolie-beschermer/bumper; Ventielpiston; Ventielveer; Ventielsteel; Waterklep (spuugklep)-eenheid; Waterklepkurk; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta zamjenskog dijela za limena puhaća glazbala: Štitnik ruba zvona; Gumb za prste; Nosač/vijak za liru; Prihvatnik usnika; Komplet za popravak; Zamjenski vijak/zatvarač; Povlačak (unutarnji); Povlačak (vanjski); Pluto za povlačak; Vijak graničnika povlačka; Poklopac ventila (donji); Poklopac ventila (gornji); Pluto ventila; Pust/jastučić ventila; Vodilica ventila; Štitnik/odbojnik za ulje ventila; Klip ventila; Opruga ventila; Tijelo ventila; Sklop zaklopke za vodu; Pluto zaklopke za vodu; Ostalo
nb: Reservedeltype for messingblåseinstrument: Klokkekantbeskytter; Fingerknapp; Lyrefeste/skrue; Munnstykkemottaker; Reparasjonssett; Erstatningsskrue/feste; Trekk (indre); Trekk (ytre); Bøylekork; Trekkstoppeskrue; Ventilhette (nederst); Ventilhette (topp); Ventilkork; Ventilfilt/pute; Ventilføring; Ventiloljebeskytter/demper; Ventilstempel; Ventilfjær; Ventilstamme; Vannklaff-/spyttventilenhet; Vannklaffkork; Annet
ko: 금관악기 교체 부품 유형: 벨 림 가드; 핑거 버튼; 라이어 마운트/나사; 마우스피스 리시버; 수리 키트; 교체용 나사/패스너; 슬라이드(내부); 슬라이드(외부); 슬라이드 코르크; 슬라이드 스토퍼 나사; 밸브 캡(하단); 밸브 캡(상단); 밸브 코르크; 밸브 펠트/쿠션; 밸브 가이드; 밸브 오일 가드/범퍼; 밸브 피스톤; 밸브 스프링; 밸브 스템; 워터 키(스핏 밸브) 어셈블리; 워터 키 코르크; 기타
es: Tipo de pieza de repuesto de instrumentos de metal: Protector para el borde de la campana; Botón de pistón; Soporte/tornillo para lira; Receptor de boquilla; Kit de reparación; Tornillo de repuesto/fijador; Bomba/vara (interior); Bomba/vara (exterior); Corcho para bomba; Tornillo de tope de vara; Tapa de pistón (inferior); Tapa de pistón (superior); Corcho de pistón; Fieltro/almohadilla de pistón; Guía de pistón; Protector/tope de aceite para pistones; Pistón; Resorte de pistón; Vástago de pistón; Ensamblaje de llave de desagüe; Corcho de llave de desagüe; Otro
pl: Typ części zamiennej instrumentu dętego blaszanego: Osłona krawędzi czary głosowej; Przycisk wentyla; Uchwyt / śruba liry; Gniazdo ustnika; Zestaw naprawczy; Śruba wymienna / element złączny; Suwak (wewnętrzny); Suwak (zewnętrzny); Korek krąglika; Śruba blokująca suwak; Kapsel wentyla (dolny); Kapsel wentyla (górny); Korek wentyla; Filc/podkładka wentyla; Prowadnica wentyla; Osłona / odbojnik wentyla; Tłok wentyla; Sprężyna wentyla; Trzpień wentyla; Zespół klapy wodnej (kranu); Korek klapy wodnej; Inne
bg-BG: Тип резервна част за медни музикални инструменти: Предпазител за ръба на раструба; Бутон за пръст; Стойка/винт за лира; Гнездо за мундщук; Ремонтен комплект; Резервен винт/скрепителен елемент; Цуг (вътрешен); Цуг (външен); Корк за цуг; Стопорен винт за цуг; Капачка на вентил (долна); Капачка на вентил (горна); Корк за вентил; Филц/подложка за вентил; Водач на вентил; Предпазител/буфер за маслото на вентила; Бутало на вентила; Пружина на вентила; Щок на вентила; Механизъм на водна клапа; Корк за водна клапа; Друго
ru: Тип запасной части духового инструмента: Защита обода раструба; Кнопка клапана; Крепление/винт для лиры; Приемник мундштука; Ремкомплект; Запасной винт/крепеж; Кулиса (внутренняя); Кулиса (внешняя); Пробка кулисы; Винт стопора кулисы; Колпачок помпы (нижний); Колпачок помпы (верхний); Пробка помпы; Фетр/амортизатор помпы; Направляющая помпы; Защита от масла/бампер помпы; Поршень помпы; Пружина помпы; Шток помпы; Клапан слива конденсата (в сборе); Пробка клапана слива конденсата; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de peça de substituição para instrumentos de sopro: Proteção da borda da campânula; Botão de pistão; Suporte/parafuso para lira; Recetor de bocal; Kit de reparação; Parafuso/fixador de substituição; Vara (interior); Vara (exterior); Cortiça da vara; Parafuso de retenção da vara; Tampa do pistão (inferior); Tampa do pistão (superior); Cortiça do pistão; Feltro/almofada do pistão; Guia de pistão; Protetor/amortecedor de óleo do pistão; Pistão de válvula; Mola do pistão; Haste do pistão; Conjunto da chave de água; Cortiça da chave de água; Outro
da: Reservedelstype til messinginstrumenter: Beskyttelse af klangstykke; Fingerknap; Beslag/skrue til marchklemme; Mundstykkemodtager; Reparationssæt; Reserveskrue/beslag; Træk (indre); Træk (ydre); Trækkork; Stopskrue til træk; Ventildæksel (bund); Ventildæksel (top); Ventilkork; Ventilfilt/pude; Ventilstyr; Ventiloliebeskytter/dæmper; Ventilstempel; Ventilfjeder; Ventilspindel; Vandklap-enhed (spytventil); Kork til spytventil; Andet
fi: Vaskipuhaltimen varaosan tyyppi: Kellon reunan suojus; Sormipainike; Lyyran kiinnike/ruuvi; Suukappaleen vastaanotin; Korjaussarja; Vaihtoruuvi/kiinnike; Luisti (sisempi); Luisti (ulompi); Luistin korkki; Luistin rajoitinruuvi; Venttiilihattu (ala); Venttiilihattu (ylä); Venttiilin korkki; Venttiilin huopa/pehmuste; Venttiilinohjain; Venttiiliöljyn suojus/vaimennin; Venttiilin mäntä; Venttiilijousi; Venttiilivarsi; Vesiventtiilikoneisto; Vesiventtiilin korkki; Muu
zh-CN: 铜管乐器替换零件类型: 喇叭口边缘保护套; 按键扣; 谱夹底座/螺丝; 号嘴接收器; 维修套件; 替换螺丝/紧固件; 调音管（内管）; 调音管（外管）; 调音管软木; 调音管限位螺丝; 活塞盖（底部）; 活塞盖（顶部）; 活塞软木; 活塞毡/垫; 活塞定位器; 活塞油挡板/缓冲垫; 活塞; 活塞弹簧; 活塞杆; 排水键（放水阀）组件; 排水键软木; 其他